Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.2 Medical Assistance Fraud

40-8.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Medical Assistance Fraud Law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-2.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter:

“Benefit” means pecuniary benefit as defined herein.

“Claim” means any request for payment, electronic or otherwise, and shall also include any data commonly known as encounter data, that is used, or is to be used, for the development of a capitation fee payable to a provider of managed healthcare goods, merchandise, or services.

“Executive office” means the executive office of health and human services, the agency designated by state law and the Medicaid state plan as the Medicaid single state agency.

“Fee schedule” means a list of goods or services to be recognized as properly compensable under the Rhode Island Medicaid program and applicable rates of reimbursement.

“Kickback” means a return in any form by any individual of a part of an expenditure made by a provider:

To the same provider;

To an entity controlled by the provider; or

To an entity that the provider intends to benefit whenever the expenditure is reimbursed, or reimbursable, or claimed by a provider as being reimbursable by the Rhode Island Medicaid program and when the sum or value returned is not credited to the benefit of the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

“Medicaid fraud control unit” means a duly certified Medicaid fraud control unit under federal regulation authorized to perform those functions as described by § 1903(q) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(q).

“Medically unnecessary services or merchandise” means services or merchandise provided to recipients intentionally without any expectation that the services or merchandise will alleviate or aid the recipient’s medical condition.

“Office of program integrity” or “OPI” means the division within the executive office of health and human services, authorized pursuant to §

42-7.2-18

, to coordinate state and local agencies, law enforcement entities, and investigative units in order to increase the effectiveness of programs and initiatives dealing with the prevention, detection, and prosecution of Medicaid and public assistance fraud; to develop cooperative strategies to investigate and eliminate Medicaid and public assistance fraud and to recover state and federal funds; and to represent the executive office and act on the secretary’s behalf in any matters related to the prevention, detection, and prosecution of Medicaid fraud under this chapter.

“Pecuniary benefit” means benefit in the form of money, property, commercial interests, or anything else the primary significance of which is economic gain.

“Person” means any person or individual, natural or otherwise, and includes those person(s) or entities defined by the term “provider.”

“Provider” means any individual, individual medical vendor, firm, corporation, professional association, partnership, organization, or other legal entity that provides goods or services under the Rhode Island Medicaid program, or the employee of any person or entity who, on his or her own behalf, or on the behalf of his or her employer, knowingly performs any act or is knowingly responsible for an omission prohibited by this chapter.

“Recipient” means any person receiving medical assistance under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

“Records” means all documents developed by a provider and related to the provision of services reimbursed or claimed as reimbursable by the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

“Rhode Island Medicaid program” means a state-administered, medical assistance program that is funded by the state and federal governments under Title XIX and Title XXI of the U.S. Social Security Act and any general or public laws and administered by the executive office of health and human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 501, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-3.
Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person intentionally to:

Present, or cause to be presented, for preauthorization or payment to the Rhode Island Medicaid program:

Any materially false or fraudulent claim or cost report for the furnishing of services or merchandise; or

Present, or cause to be presented, for preauthorization or payment, any claim or cost report for medically unnecessary services or merchandise; or

To submit, or cause to be submitted, materially false or fraudulent information for the intentional purpose(s) of obtaining greater compensation than that to which the provider is legally entitled for the furnishing of services or merchandise; or

Submit, or cause to be submitted, materially false information for the purpose of obtaining authorization for furnishing services or merchandise; or

Submit, or cause to be submitted, any claim or cost report or other document that fails to make full disclosure of material information.

Solicit, receive, offer, or pay any remuneration, including any kickback, bribe, or rebate, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce referrals from or to any person in return for furnishing of services or merchandise, or in return for referring an individual to a person for the furnishing of any services or merchandise, for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Provided, however, that in any prosecution under this subsection, it shall not be necessary for the state to prove that the remuneration returned was taken from any particular expenditure made by a person.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, a duplicate claim for services, supplies, or merchandise to the Rhode Island Medicaid program for which the provider has already received or claimed reimbursement from any source, unless the duplicate claim is filed:

For payment of more than one type of service or merchandise furnished or rendered to a recipient for which the use of more than one type of claim is necessary; or

Because of a lack of a response from, or a request by, the Rhode Island Medicaid program; provided, however, in such instance, a duplicate claim will clearly be identified as such, in writing, by the provider; or

Simultaneous with a claim submission to another source of payment when the provider has knowledge that the other payor will not pay the claim.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, to the Rhode Island Medicaid program a claim for service or merchandise that was not rendered to a recipient.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, to the Rhode Island Medicaid program a claim for services or merchandise that includes costs or charges not related to the provision or rendering of services or merchandise to the recipient.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, a claim or refer a recipient to a person for services or merchandise under the Rhode Island Medicaid program that are intentionally not documented in the provider’s record and/or are medically unnecessary as that term is defined by §

40-8.2-2(7)

.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, to the Rhode Island Medicaid program a claim that materially misrepresents:

The description of services or merchandise rendered or provided to a recipient;

The cost of the services or merchandise rendered or provided to a recipient;

The dates that the services or merchandise were rendered or provided to a recipient;

The identity of the recipient(s) of the services or merchandise; or

The identity of the attending, prescribing, or referring practitioner or the identity of the actual provider.

Submit a claim for reimbursement to the Rhode Island Medicaid program for service(s) or merchandise at a fee or charge that exceeds the provider’s lowest fee or charge for the provision of the service or merchandise to the general public.

Submit, or cause to be submitted, to the Rhode Island Medicaid program a claim for a service or merchandise that was not rendered by the provider, unless the claim is submitted on behalf of:

A bona fide provider employee of the provider; or

An affiliated provider entity owned or controlled by the provider; or

A provider by a third-party billing service under a written agreement with the provider, and the claims are submitted in a manner that does not otherwise violate the provisions of this chapter.

Render or provide services or merchandise under the Rhode Island Medicaid program, unless otherwise authorized by the regulations of the Rhode Island Medicaid program, without a provider’s written order and the recipient’s consent, or submit, or cause to be submitted, a claim for services or merchandise, except in emergency situations or when the recipient is a minor or is incompetent to give consent. The type of consent to be required hereunder can include verbal acquiescence of the recipient and need not require a signed consent form or the recipient’s signature, except where otherwise required by the regulations of the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Charge any recipient, or person acting on behalf of a recipient, money or other consideration in addition to, or in excess of, the rates of remuneration established under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Enter into an agreement, combination, or conspiracy with any party other than the Rhode Island Medicaid program to obtain or aid another to obtain reimbursement or payments from the Rhode Island Medicaid program to which the person, recipient, or provider seeking reimbursement or payment is not entitled.

Make a material false statement in the application for enrollment as a provider under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Refuse to provide representatives of the Medicaid fraud control unit, upon reasonable request, access to information and data pertaining to services or merchandise rendered to eligible recipients and/or former recipients while recipients under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Obtain any monies by false pretenses through the use of any artifice, scheme, or design prohibited by this section.

Seek or obtain employment with or as a provider after having actual or constructive knowledge of a then-existing exclusion issued under the authority of 42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7.

Grant, or offer to grant, employment in violation of a then-existing exclusion issued under the authority of 42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7, having actual or constructive knowledge of the existence of such exclusion.

File a false document to gain employment in a Medicaid-funded facility or with a provider.

A provider or person who violates any provision of subsection (a), excepting subsection (a)(14), (a)(16), or (a)(18), is guilty of a felony for each violation, and upon conviction therefor, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) years, nor fined more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

A provider or person who violates the provisions of subsection (a)(14), (a)(16), or (a)(18), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for each violation and, upon conviction, be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any provider who knowingly and willfully participates in any offense, either as a principal or as an accessory or conspirator, shall be subject to the same penalty as if the provider had committed the substantive offense.

The provisions of subsection (a)(2) shall not apply to:

A discount or other reduction in price obtained by a person or provider of services or merchandise under the Rhode Island Medicaid program if the reduction in price is properly disclosed and appropriately reflected in the costs claimed or charges made by the person or provider under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Any amount paid by an employer to an employee, who has a bona fide employment relationship with the employer, for employment in the provision of covered services or merchandise furnished under the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

Any amounts paid by a vendor of services or merchandise to a person authorized to act as a purchasing agent for a group of individuals or entities furnishing services or merchandise that are reimbursed by the Rhode Island Medicaid program, as long as:

The purchasing agent has a written agreement with each individual or entity in the group that specifies the amount the agent will be paid by each vendor (where the sum may be a fixed sum or a fixed percentage of the value of the purchases made from the vendor by the group under the contract between the vendor and the purchasing agent); and

In the case of an entity that is a provider of services to the Rhode Island Medicaid program, the agent discloses in writing to the individual or entity, in accordance with regulations to be promulgated by the executive office, and to the office of program integrity upon request, the amount received from each vendor with respect to purchases made by or on behalf of the entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 501, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 17; P.L. 1993, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-4.
Statute of limitations.

The statute of limitations for any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 501, § 3.

40-8.2-5.
Civil remedy.

Any person, including the secretary of the executive office of health and human services or the office of program integrity acting on behalf of the secretary of the office, injured by any violation of the provisions of §

40-8.2-3

or §

40-8.2-4

may recover through a civil action from the persons inflicting the injury three (3) times the amount of the injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-6.
Civil actions brought by attorney general on behalf of persons injured by violations of chapter.

The attorney general may bring a civil action in superior court in the name of the state, as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in this state, to secure monetary relief as provided in this section for injuries sustained by such persons by reason of any violation of this chapter. The court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action any amount of monetary relief:

That duplicates amounts that have been awarded for the same injury; or

That is properly allocable to persons who have excluded their claims pursuant to subsection (c)(1).

The court shall award the state as monetary relief threefold the total damage sustained as described in subsection (a) and the costs of bringing suit, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

In any action brought under subsection (a), the attorney general shall, at such times, in such manner, and with such content as the court may direct, cause notice thereof to be given by publication.

Any person on whose behalf an action is brought under subsection (a) may elect to exclude from adjudication the portion of the state claim for monetary relief attributable to him or her by filing notice of the election with the court within such time as specified in the notice given pursuant to this subsection.

The final judgment in an action under subsection (a) shall be res judicata as to any claim under §

40-8.2-5

by any person on behalf of whom the action was brought and who fails to give notice within the period specified in the notice given pursuant to this subsection.

An action under subsection (a) shall not be dismissed or compromised without the approval of the court, and notice of any proposed dismissal or compromise shall be given by publication at such times, in such manner, and with such content as the court may direct.

In any action under subsection (a):

The amount of the plaintiff’s attorney’s fees, if any, shall be determined by the court, and any attorney’s fees awarded to the attorney general shall be deposited with the state as general revenues; and

The court may, in its discretion, award a reasonable attorney’s fee to a prevailing defendant upon a finding that the attorney general has acted in bad faith, vexatiously, wantonly, or for oppressive reasons.

Monetary relief recovered in an action under this section shall:

Be distributed in such manner as the court, in its discretion, may authorize; or

Be deemed a civil penalty by the court and deposited with the state as general revenues; subject in either case to the requirement that any distribution procedure adopted afford each person a reasonable opportunity to secure his or her appropriate portion of the net monetary relief.

In any action under this section, the fact that a person or public body has not dealt directly with the defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery. Provided, however, that the court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief which duplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-7.
False statements made to gain certification.

Whoever knowingly and willfully makes, or causes to be made, or induces, or seeks to induce, the making of any false statement or representation of a material fact with respect to the conditions or operation of any institution or facility in order that the institution or facility may qualify (either upon initial certification or upon recertification) as a hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate-care facility, or home health agency, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-8.
Acts of officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority.

A corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership is liable for the acts of its officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority. Proof of the acts of any officer, director, representative, or agent shall be received as prima facie proof of the acts of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership itself.

When a corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership violates this chapter, the violation shall be deemed to be that of the individual directors, members, officers, managers, employees, or agents of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership who knowingly authorized, ordered, aided, abetted, or advised in the acts or omissions constituting, in whole or in part, the violation, whether the individuals acted on their own behalf and for their own benefit, or for the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership and in their representative capacity. The individuals, in their capacity as individuals, are subject to the provisions of this chapter and may be joined, if subject to personal jurisdiction, as additional parties defendant in the proceedings against the corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-9.
Damages for overcharges.

When the cost of the services provided to the patient is being paid under the Rhode Island Medicaid program, any person who knowingly and willfully:

Charges a patient, or anyone acting on behalf of a patient, money or other consideration at a rate in excess of the rates established by the state of Rhode Island; or

Charges, solicits, accepts, or receives, in addition to any amount otherwise required to be paid under the Rhode Island Medicaid program, any gift, money, or donation as a precondition of the admission of a patient to a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate-care facility, or of the continued stay in a facility, shall be liable in a civil action to the patient or person acting on his or her behalf for an amount equal to three (3) times the amount of the charge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-10.
Other civil remedies and criminal penalties.

The penalties and remedies under this statute are not exclusive and shall not preclude the use of any other civil remedy or the application of any other criminal penalty deemed appropriate by the attorney general in accordance with federal law or regulations governing Title XIX or Title XXI or the general or public laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-11.
Barring or suspending participation in program.

Whenever a provider is sentenced or placed on probation for an offense under this chapter, the trial judge may, in his or her discretion, order that the provider be permanently barred from further participation in the program; that the provider’s participation in the program be suspended for a definite period of time not exceeding two (2) years; or that the provider conform to applicable federal regulations. For the purposes of this section, the office of program integrity may submit a recommendation to the trial judge as to whether the provider should be suspended or barred from the program. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent the executive office of health and human services from imposing its own administrative sanctions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-12.
Injunctive relief and civil penalties.

The superior court of this state shall have jurisdiction to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter. In addition to granting prohibitory injunctive and other restraints for a period of time and upon terms and conditions necessary to deter a provider from, and ensure against, the committing of future violations of this chapter, the court may grant injunctive relief reasonably necessary to dissipate the ill effects of the violation. The court may issue appropriate decrees upon consent and stipulation by the parties. The court may also issue restraining orders. Under no circumstances shall the state be required to post bond in any action hereunder.

Attorney general — Right to injunctive relief. The attorney general may institute proceedings to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter as provided in subsection (a).

Other persons — Right to injunctive relief. Any person, including the United States, may institute proceedings for injunctive relief, temporary or permanent, as provided in subsection (a) against threatened loss or damage to his or her property or business by a violation of this chapter. A preliminary injunction may be issued upon a showing that the danger of irreparable loss or damage is immediate and, within the court’s discretion, the execution of property bond against damages for an injunction improvidently granted. If the court issues a permanent injunction, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees, filing fees, and reasonable costs of the suit. Reasonable costs for the suit may include, but shall not be limited to, the expenses of discovery and document reproduction.

Civil penalty. In addition to injunctive relief authorized pursuant to subsection (a), any person who violates this chapter may be liable for a civil penalty in a suit by the attorney general of this state of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-13.
Consent decrees.

The attorney general may petition the court to enter a consent decree dismissing any criminal prosecution hereunder, but the court shall review the proceeding to determine whether entry thereof is in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-14.
Investigative demand.

Demand.

The attorney general, or his or her designated assistant attorney general, shall have the power to issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

Whenever the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that any person may have knowledge or be in possession, custody, or control of any documentary material pertinent to an investigation of a possible violation of this chapter, the attorney general may issue in writing and cause to be served upon the person an investigative demand by which he or she may:

Compel the attendance of the person and require him or her to submit to examination and give testimony under oath; and/or

Require the production of documentary material pertinent to the investigation for inspection or copying; and/or

Require an answer to written interrogatories to be furnished under oath. The power to issue investigative demands shall not abate or terminate by reason of the bringing of any action or proceeding under this chapter. The attorney general may issue successive investigative demands to the same person in order to obtain additional information pertinent to an ongoing investigation.

The civil investigative demands shall be filed in the superior court of the county in which the person served with the demand shall dwell or have his or her principal place of business.

Contents of investigative demand. Each investigative demand shall:

State the section or sections of the chapter, the alleged violation of which is under investigation, and the general subject matter of this investigation;

Prescribe a reasonable return date no less than forty (40) days after service of the investigative demand, provided that an earlier date may be prescribed under compelling circumstances, but in no event less than twenty (20) days;

Specify the time and place at which the person is to appear and give testimony, produce documentary material, and furnish answers to interrogatories or do any or a combination of the aforesaid;

Describe by class any documentary material required to be produced, so as to clearly indicate what is demanded; and

Contain any interrogatories to which written answers under oath are required.

Prohibition against unreasonable demand. No investigative demand shall:

Contain any requirement that would be unreasonable or improper if contained in a subpoena issued by a court of this state; or

Require the disclosure of any material or information that would be privileged, or that for any other reason would not be required to be disclosed by a subpoena issued by a court of this state, including, but not limited to, trade secrets or confidential scientific, technical, merchandising, production, management, or commercial information, to the extent that the same are protected pursuant to the Rhode Island rules of civil procedure.

Offer of documentary evidence. Where the information requested upon oral examination or written interrogatory pursuant to an investigative demand may be derived or ascertained from the business records of the person upon whom the demand has been served or from an examination, audit, or inspection of the business records or from a compilation, abstract, or summary based thereon, and the burden of deriving or ascertaining the answer is substantially the same for the attorney general as for the person from whom the information is requested, it is sufficient for that person to specify the records from which the answer may be derived or ascertained, and to afford the attorney general reasonable opportunity to examine, audit, or inspect the records and to make copies, compilations, abstracts, or summaries.

Service of investigative demand. An investigative demand may be served by any means provided under the Rhode Island rules of civil procedure for service of a complaint in a civil action.

Motion to quash. Within twenty (20) days after the service of an investigative demand, or at any time before the return date specified therein, whichever period is shorter, the person served may file in a state superior court and serve upon the attorney general a petition for an order of court modifying or setting aside the demand. The time allowed for compliance, in whole or in part, with the demand as deemed proper and ordered by the court shall not run while the petition is pending before the court. The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief and may be based upon any failure of the demand to comply with the provisions of this chapter or upon any constitutional or other legal right, privilege, or qualified privilege of the party, including that the material or information sought constitutes trade secrets or confidential scientific, technical, merchandising, production, management, or commercial information. If qualified privilege is raised, the court may order the person to comply with the demand only upon a showing of particularized need and subject to an appropriate protective order. The provisions of this subsection shall be the sole and exclusive means for challenging the requirements of the demand.

Those authorized to examine. The examinations of all persons pursuant to this section shall be conducted by the attorney general, or his or her designee, before an officer authorized to administer oaths in this state. The statement made shall be taken down stenographically or by a sound-recording device and shall be transcribed.

Right of persons served with investigative demands.

Any person required to attend and give testimony or to submit documentary material pursuant to this section shall be entitled to retain, or on payment of a lawfully prescribed cost to procure, a copy of any document he or she produces and of his or her own statements as transcribed.

Any person compelled to appear under a demand for oral testimony pursuant to this section may be accompanied, represented, and advised by counsel. Counsel may advise the person in confidence, upon the request of the person. The person or counsel may object on the record to any question, in whole or in part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may properly be made, received, and entered upon the record when it is claimed that the person is entitled to refuse to answer the question on grounds of any constitutional or other legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self-incrimination. The person shall not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question, and shall not by himself or herself or through counsel otherwise interrupt the oral examination. If the person refuses to answer any question, the attorney general may petition the superior court for an order compelling the person to answer the question.

The information and materials supplied to the attorney general pursuant to an investigative demand shall not be permitted to become public or be disclosed by the attorney general, or his or her employees, beyond the extent necessary for enforcement purposes in the public interest.

Upon the completion of a case brought under this chapter, the attorney general shall return any documents, answers, and transcripts, and all copies thereof, that have not passed into the control of the court through the introduction thereof into the record, to the person who provided the documents, answers, or testimony. If no case in which the material may be used has been commenced within a reasonable time after completion of the examination or analysis of all documentary material, but in no event later than two (2) years after production thereof, the attorney general shall, upon written request of the person who produced the material, return all documents, answers, and transcripts, and all copies thereof, to the person who provided them.

The attorney general shall have the authority, at any time, to modify or revoke any investigative demand and to stipulate to protective orders with respect to documents and information submitted in response to a demand. The protective orders shall include provisions appropriate to the full and adequate protection of confidential healthcare information pursuant to chapter 37.3 of title 5.

Witness expenses. All persons served with an investigative demand, other than those persons whose conduct or practices are being investigated or any officer, director, or person in the employment of a person under investigation shall be paid the same fees and mileage as paid witnesses in the courts of this state. No person shall be excused from attending the inquiry pursuant to the mandate of an investigative demand or from giving testimony or from producing documentary material or from being required to answer questions on the ground of failure to tender or pay a witness fee or mileage, unless demand therefore is made at the time testimony is about to be taken or unless payment thereof is not thereupon made.

Refusal of witness to testify or produce documents. Any person who shall neglect or refuse to attend and give testimony or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce documentary material, if in his or her power to do so, in obedience to any investigative demand pursuant to this section, may be adjudged in civil contempt by the superior court until such time as he or she purges himself or herself of contempt by testifying, producing documentary material, or presenting written answers as ordered. Any person who commits perjury or false swearing in response to an investigative demand pursuant to this section shall be punished pursuant to the provisions of chapter 33 of title 11.

Duty to testify — Immunity.

If, in any investigation brought by the attorney general pursuant to this section, any individual shall refuse to attend or to give testimony or to produce documentary material or to answer a written interrogatory in obedience to an investigative demand or under order of court on the ground that the testimony or material required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her, that person may be ordered to attend and to give testimony or to produce documentary material or to answer the written interrogatory, or to do an applicable combination of these pursuant to §

12-17-15

. The order described in this subsection shall be an order of court given after hearing in which the attorney general has established a need for the grant of immunity, as hereinafter provided.

The attorney general may petition for an order as described in subsection (k)(1) for any investigation pursuant to this chapter. The petition shall set forth the nature of the investigation and the need for the immunization of any witness.

Testimony so compelled shall not be used against the witness as evidence in any criminal proceedings against him or her in any court. The grant of immunity shall not immunize the witness from civil liability arising from the transactions about which testimony is given, and he or she may nevertheless be presented or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering, or in failing to answer, or in producing evidence, or failing to do so, in accordance with the order. The foregoing shall not prevent the attorney general from instituting other appropriate contempt proceedings against any person who violates any of the above provisions.

Duty of public officials. It shall be the duty of all officials of this state and its public bodies, their deputies, assistants, clerks, subordinates, or employees, and all other persons to reorder and furnish to the attorney general when so requested, all information and assistance in their possession or within their power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 130.

40-8.2-15.
Consistency with Confidentiality of Health Care Information Act.

No investigative demand pursuant to this chapter shall solicit, extend to, or compel the production, inspection, copying, or release of any record or information otherwise protected as confidential healthcare information pursuant to chapter 37.3 of title 5.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-16.
Rendering services to recipients after suspension or revocation of certification.

No provider shall charge the Rhode Island Medicaid program for any services rendered to recipients subsequent to the revocation or suspension of the provider’s certification except as specified by a termination notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1.

40-8.2-17.
Stays and review of revocation orders.

An order of the executive office of health and human services revoking a provider’s certification may, in the discretion of the program, go into immediate effect or may be stayed. Review of any order may be had in accordance with the Rhode Island administrative procedures act, §§

42-35-1

—

42-35-1

8. If an administrative hearing is claimed, the program may, in its discretion, stay the effect of a revocation until a hearing is held and a decision is rendered, and for a period not to exceed ten (10) days after the administrative decision is rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-18.
Filing and enforcement of administrative decision.

An administrative decision, not appealed, or which has been affirmed after judicial review under the Rhode Island administrative procedures act, §§

42-35-1

—

42-35-1

8, determining any amounts due to the executive office of health and human services or to a provider, may be filed with the clerk of the superior court for Providence County and shall be enforceable as a judgment of that court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-19.
Certification as a provider — Revocation or suspension of certification.

Before any provider of medical services receives payment from the Rhode Island Medicaid program, and as a condition of receipt of payment, the provider must have in effect a valid certification of eligibility from the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services. This certification of eligibility will take the form of either a separate provider agreement or language as required by federal regulations imprinted on the medical assistance billing form, which must be signed by the provider. This certification may be revoked or suspended, in accordance with administrative rules to be promulgated by the executive office, if a provider fails to meet professional licensure requirements; violates any administrative regulations of the executive office of health and human services; does not provide proper professional services; is the subject of a suspension of payments order; is convicted of Medicaid fraud; or otherwise violates any provision of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-20.
Eligibility for certification.

A certification will apply to any provider who agrees to provide services in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the Rhode Island Medicaid program and who has in effect a proper professional license when a license is a prerequisite to rendering services. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to mean that certification may not be revoked for failure to provide proper professional services, although a provider’s professional license has not been revoked or suspended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 242, § 1.